src/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc
LEXICON Exceptions


!! NOUNS

!! KIN TERMS
! +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Com +Cmpr +PxSg3 K
веҥе+N+Sg:веҥым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
веҥе+N+Sg:веҥыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

оньо+N+Sg:оньым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
оньо+N+Sg:оньыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

чӱчӱ+N+Sg:чӱчӱм N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
чӱчӱ+N+Sg:чӱчӱч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

чӱчӱньӧ+N+Sg:чӱчӱньым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
чӱчӱньӧ+N+Sg:чӱчӱньыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

шешке+N+Sg:шешкым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
шешке+N+Sg:шешкыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
шольо+N+Sg:шольым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
шольо+N+Sg:шольыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
эрге+N+Sg:эргым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1;
эрге+N+Sg:эргыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;
нудо+N+Sg:нудым N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
нудо+N+Sg:нудыч N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

!! Single-syllable nouns in У Ӱ Ю
лу:лу N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ну:ну N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
пу:пу N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ру:ру N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ту:ту N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
шу:шу N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
кӱ:кӱ N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
ю:ю N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;
у+A+Der/MWN:у N_SINGLE-SYLLABLE-U ;

!! VERBS
манаш+V+Ger+Gen:ман K ;

LEXICON N_KIN_SPECIAL ! will this work?
N_KIN_SPECIAL_1 ;
N_KIN_SPECIAL_2 ;

LEXICON N_KIN_SPECIAL_1
+Nom+PxSg1: K ;
+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ын K ;
+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ым K ;
+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC:%>лан K ;
+Com+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ге K ;
+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC:%>ла K ;

LEXICON N_KIN_SPECIAL_2
+Nom+PxSg2: K ;
+Gen+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ын K ;
+Acc+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ым K ;
+Dat+PxSg2+So/PC:%>лан K ;
+Com+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ге K ;
+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>ла K ;
